Louisiana, session 2026, HB717.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 3:4744(Section heading) and (A) are hereby amended and reenacted
to read as follows:
§4744. Applicability; prohibited activities; labeling
A.(1) The provisions of this Part shall apply only to a person that places a
label on a food product as defined in R.S. 3:4743.
(2) Any cell cultured food product shall bear a clear and conspicuous
disclosure identifying the product in a bold typed print of not less than thirty-point
font.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.